Washington statutes.
RCW 26.16.080

Execution of conveyance under power.

Any conveyance, transfer, deed, lease or other encumbrances executed under and by virtue of such power of attorney shall be executed, acknowledged and certified in the same manner as if the person making such power of attorney had been unmarried or not in a state registered domestic partnership.

[ 2008 c 6 s 608; 1888 c 27 s 3; RRS s 10574.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.